Utah statutes.
63G-6-106.   Records.
(1)  All procurement records shall be retained and disposed of in accordance
with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.
(2)  Written determinations required by this chapter shall also be retained in
the appropriate official contract file of the Division of Purchasing and
General Services or the purchasing agency.
